Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.58.030

Platting and subdivision of land.

The provisions of chapter 58.17 RCW together with the provisions of a code city's subdivision regulations as adopted by ordinance not inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 58.17 RCW shall control the platting and subdividing of land into lots or tracts comprising five or more of such lots or tracts or containing a dedication of any part thereof as a public street or highway, or other public place or use: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall prohibit the legislative body of a code city from adopting reasonable ordinances regulating the subdivision of land into two or more parcels without requiring compliance with all of the requirements of the platting law.

[ 1983 c 3 s 70; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 9; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.58.030.]

NOTES: